Montana, session 2025, HB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-15-1731, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-1731. Board of medical examiners. (1) In accordance with 37-1-123, there is a Montana state
board of medical examiners.
(2) The board consists of 12 members:
(a) five four doctors of medicine, including one with experience in emergency medicine, none of
whom may be from the same county;
(b) one doctor of osteopathy;
(c) one podiatrist;
(d) one nutritionist;
(e) one two physician assistant assistants;
(f) one emergency care provider, as defined in 50-6-202, who may be a volunteer emergency care
provider; and
(g) two public members.
(3) The board is allocated to the department as prescribed in 2-15-121."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 199